Hawaii statutes.
§587A-3 Guiding principles for children in
foster care. (a) The department or an authorized agency, as resource
family or permanent custodian, shall abide by the following guiding principles
and ensure that a child in foster care:

(1) Lives in a safe and healthy home, free from
physical, psychological, sexual, and other abuse;

(2) Has adequate:

(A) Food that is nutritious and healthy;

(B) Clothing;

(C) Medical care, dental and orthodontic
services, and corrective vision care; and

(D) Mental health services;

(3) Has supervised or unsupervised in-person,
telephone, or other forms of contact with the child's parents and siblings
while the child is in foster care, unless prohibited by court order;

(4) Has in-person contact with the child's assigned
child protective services worker, guardian ad litem, and if applicable, the
child's probation officer;

(5) Meets with the presiding judge in the child's
case;

(6) Is enrolled in a comprehensive health insurance
plan and, within forty-five days of out-of-home placement, is provided with a
comprehensive health assessment and treatment as recommended;

(7) May freely exercise the child's own religious
beliefs, including the refusal to attend any religious activities and services;

(8) Has a personal bank account and assistance in
managing the child's personal income consistent with the child's age and
development, unless safety or other concerns require otherwise;

(9) Has the right to attend school and, if the child
is moved during a school year, has the right to complete the school year at the
same school, if practicable;

(10) Beginning at age twelve, is provided with
age-appropriate life skills training and a transition plan for appropriately
moving out of the foster care system, as well as written information concerning
independent living programs, foster youth organizations, transitional planning
services, and independent living case management programs that are available to
all children in foster care who are twelve years of age or older and their resource
families; and

(11) May participate in extracurricular, enrichment,
cultural, and social activities; provided that the child caring institution or
resource caregiver authorizes the participation in accordance with the
reasonable and prudent parent standard as defined in title 42 United States
Code section [675(10)(A)].

(b) Sua sponte or upon appropriate motion, the
family court may issue any necessary orders to any party, including the
department, department of education, or department of health, to ensure
adherence to the guiding principles enumerated in subsection (a) above. [L
2010, c 135, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 133, §4]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next